epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sr_Latn.xml
	<patterns>
		t2j
		t2l
		t2lj
		t2r
		t2v
		d2j
		d2l
		d2lj
		d2r
		d2v
		g2j
		g2l
		g2lj
		g2r
		g2v
		h2j
		h2l
		h2lj
		h2r
		h2v
		k2j
		k2l
		k2lj
		k2r
		k2v
		2d1b
		2d1c
		2d1d
		2d1f
		2d1g
		2d1h
		2d1k
		2d1m
		2d1n
		2d1p
		2d1s
		2d1t
		2d1nj
		2d1dž
		2d1z
		2d1š
		2d1đ
		2d1ć
		2d1č
		2g1ž
		2g1b
		2g1c
		2g1d
		2g1f
		2g1g
		2g1h
		2g1k
		2g1m
		2g1n
		2g1p
		2g1s
		2g1t
		2g1nj
		2g1dž
		2g1z
		2g1š
		2g1đ
		2g1ć
		2g1č
		2h1ž
		2h1b
		2h1c
		2h1d
		2h1f
		2h1g
		2h1h
		2h1k
		2h1m
		2h1n
		2h1p
		2h1s
		2h1t
		2h1nj
		2h1dž
		2h1z
		2h1š
		2h1đ
		2h1ć
		2h1č
		2k1ž
		2k1b
		2k1c
		2k1d
		2k1f
		2k1g
		2k1h
		2k1k
		2k1m
		2k1n
		2k1p
		2k1s
		2k1t
		2k1nj
		2k1dž
		2k1z
		2k1š
		2k1đ
		2k1ć
		2k1č
		2t1ž
		2t1b
		2t1c
		2t1d
		2t1f
		2t1g
		2t1h
		2t1k
		2t1m
		2t1n
		2t1p
		2t1s
		2t1t
		2t1nj
		2t1dž
		2t1z
		2t1š
		2t1đ
		2t1ć
		2t1č
		2dj.
		2dl.
		2dlj.
		2dr.
		2dv.
		2gj.
		2gl.
		2glj.
		2gr.
		2gv.
		2hj.
		2hl.
		2hlj.
		2hr.
		2hv.
		2kj.
		2kl.
		2klj.
		2kr.
		2kv.
		2tj.
		2tl.
		2tlj.
		2tr.
		2tv.
		p2j
		p2l
		p2lj
		p2r
		v2j
		v2l
		v2lj
		v2r
		b2j
		b2l
		b2lj
		b2r
		f2j
		f2l
		f2lj
		f2r
		m2j
		m2l
		m2lj
		m2r
		2b1ž
		2b1b
		2b1c
		2b1d
		2b1f
		2b1g
		2b1h
		2b1k
		2b1m
		2b1n
		2b1p
		2b1s
		2b1t
		2b1v
		2b1nj
		2b1dž
		2b1z
		2b1š
		2b1đ
		2b1ć
		2b1č
		2f1ž
		2f1b
		2f1c
		2f1d
		2f1f
		2f1g
		2f1h
		2f1k
		2f1m
		2f1n
		2f1p
		2f1s
		2f1t
		2f1v
		2f1nj
		2f1dž
		2f1z
		2f1š
		2f1đ
		2f1ć
		2f1č
		2m1ž
		2m1b
		2m1c
		2m1d
		2m1f
		2m1g
		2m1h
		2m1k
		2m1m
		2m1n
		2m1p
		2m1s
		2m1t
		2m1v
		2m1nj
		2m1dž
		2m1z
		2m1š
		2m1đ
		2m1ć
		2m1č
		2p1ž
		2p1b
		2p1c
		2p1d
		2p1f
		2p1g
		2p1h
		2p1k
		2p1m
		2p1n
		2p1p
		2p1s
		2p1t
		2p1v
		2p1nj
		2p1dž
		2p1z
		2p1š
		2p1đ
		2p1ć
		2p1č
		2v1ž
		2v1b
		2v1c
		2v1d
		2v1f
		2v1g
		2v1h
		2v1k
		2v1m
		2v1n
		2v1p
		2v1s
		2v1t
		2v1v
		2v1nj
		2v1dž
		2v1z
		2v1š
		2v1đ
		2v1ć
		2v1č
		2bj.
		2bl.
		2blj.
		2br.
		2fj.
		2fl.
		2flj.
		2fr.
		2mj.
		2ml.
		2mlj.
		2mr.
		2pj.
		2pl.
		2plj.
		2pr.
		2vj.
		2vl.
		2vlj.
		2vr.
		s2c
		s2j
		s2k
		s2l
		s2m
		s2n
		s2p
		s2lj
		s2r
		s2t
		s2v
		s2nj
		2s1ž
		2s1b
		2s1d
		2s1f
		2s1g
		2s1h
		2s1s
		2s1dž
		2s1z
		2s1š
		2s1đ
		2s1ć
		2s1č
		2sj.
		2sk.
		2sl.
		2sm.
		2sn.
		2sp.
		2slj.
		2sr.
		2st.
		2sv.
		2snj.
		2sc.
		z2b
		z2d
		z2g
		z2j
		z2l
		z2m
		z2n
		z2lj
		z2r
		z2v
		z2nj
		2z1ž
		2z1c
		2z1f
		2z1h
		2z1k
		2z1p
		2z1s
		2z1t
		2z1dž
		2z1z
		2z1š
		2z1đ
		2z1ć
		2z1č
		2zj.
		2zl.
		2zm.
		2zn.
		2zlj.
		2zr.
		2zv.
		2znj.
		2zb.
		2zd.
		2zg.
		š2c
		š2k
		š2l
		š2m
		š2n
		š2p
		š2lj
		š2t
		š2v
		š2nj
		š2ć
		š2č
		2š1ž
		2š1b
		2š1d
		2š1f
		2š1g
		2š1h
		2š1s
		2š1dž
		2š1z
		2š1š
		2š1đ
		2š1j
		2š1r
		2šk.
		2šl.
		2šm.
		2šn.
		2šp.
		2šlj.
		2št.
		2šv.
		2šnj.
		2šć.
		2šč.
		2šc.
		ž2b
		ž2d
		ž2g
		ž2l
		ž2m
		ž2n
		ž2lj
		ž2v
		ž2nj
		ž2đ
		2ž1ž
		2ž1c
		2ž1f
		2ž1h
		2ž1k
		2ž1p
		2ž1s
		2ž1t
		2ž1dž
		2ž1z
		2ž1š
		2ž1ć
		2ž1č
		2ž1j
		2ž1r
		2žl.
		2žm.
		2žn.
		2žlj.
		2žv.
		2žnj.
		2žđ.
		2žb.
		2žd.
		2žg.
		c2j
		c2r
		c2v
		2c1ž
		2c1b
		2c1c
		2c1d
		2c1f
		2c1g
		2c1h
		2c1k
		2c1l
		2c1m
		2c1n
		2c1p
		2c1lj
		2c1s
		2c1t
		2c1nj
		2c1dž
		2c1z
		2c1š
		2c1đ
		2c1ć
		2c1č
		2cj.
		2cr.
		2cv.
		č2v
		2č1ž
		2č1b
		2č1c
		2č1d
		2č1f
		2č1g
		2č1h
		2č1j
		2č1k
		2č1l
		2č1m
		2č1n
		2č1p
		2č1lj
		2č1r
		2č1s
		2č1t
		2č1nj
		2č1dž
		2č1z
		2č1š
		2č1đ
		2č1ć
		2č1č
		2čv.
		2j1ž
		2j1b
		2j1c
		2j1d
		2j1f
		2j1g
		2j1h
		2j1j
		2j1k
		2j1l
		2j1m
		2j1n
		2j1p
		2j1lj
		2j1r
		2j1s
		2j1t
		2j1v
		2j1nj
		2j1dž
		2j1z
		2j1š
		2j1đ
		2j1ć
		2j1č
		2l1ž
		2l1b
		2l1c
		2l1d
		2l1f
		2l1g
		2l1h
		2l1k
		2l1l
		2l1m
		2l1n
		2l1p
		2l1lj
		2l1r
		2l1s
		2l1t
		2l1v
		2l1nj
		2l1dž
		2l1z
		2l1š
		2l1đ
		2l1ć
		2l1č
		2n1ž
		2n1b
		2n1c
		2n1d
		2n1f
		2n1g
		2n1h
		2n1k
		2n1l
		2n1m
		2n1n
		2n1p
		2n1lj
		2n1r
		2n1s
		2n1t
		2n1v
		2n1nj
		2n1dž
		2n1z
		2n1š
		2n1đ
		2n1ć
		2n1č
		2lj1ž
		2lj1b
		2lj1c
		2lj1d
		2lj1f
		2lj1g
		2lj1h
		2lj1j
		2lj1k
		2lj1l
		2lj1m
		2lj1n
		2lj1p
		2lj1lj
		2lj1r
		2lj1s
		2lj1t
		2lj1v
		2lj1nj
		2lj1dž
		2lj1z
		2lj1š
		2lj1đ
		2lj1ć
		2lj1č
		2r1ž
		2r1b
		2r1c
		2r1d
		2r1f
		2r1g
		2r1h
		2r1j
		2r1k
		2r1l
		2r1m
		2r1n
		2r1p
		2r1lj
		2r1r
		2r1s
		2r1t
		2r1v
		2r1nj
		2r1dž
		2r1z
		2r1š
		2r1đ
		2r1ć
		2r1č
		2nj1ž
		2nj1b
		2nj1c
		2nj1d
		2nj1f
		2nj1g
		2nj1h
		2nj1j
		2nj1k
		2nj1l
		2nj1m
		2nj1n
		2nj1p
		2nj1lj
		2nj1r
		2nj1s
		2nj1t
		2nj1v
		2nj1nj
		2nj1dž
		2nj1z
		2nj1š
		2nj1đ
		2nj1ć
		2nj1č
		2dž1ž
		2dž1b
		2dž1c
		2dž1d
		2dž1f
		2dž1g
		2dž1h
		2dž1j
		2dž1k
		2dž1l
		2dž1m
		2dž1n
		2dž1p
		2dž1lj
		2dž1r
		2dž1s
		2dž1t
		2dž1v
		2dž1nj
		2dž1dž
		2dž1z
		2dž1š
		2dž1đ
		2dž1ć
		2dž1č
		2đ1ž
		2đ1b
		2đ1c
		2đ1d
		2đ1f
		2đ1g
		2đ1h
		2đ1j
		2đ1k
		2đ1l
		2đ1m
		2đ1n
		2đ1p
		2đ1lj
		2đ1r
		2đ1s
		2đ1t
		2đ1v
		2đ1nj
		2đ1dž
		2đ1z
		2đ1š
		2đ1đ
		2đ1ć
		2đ1č
		2ć1ž
		2ć1b
		2ć1c
		2ć1d
		2ć1f
		2ć1g
		2ć1h
		2ć1j
		2ć1k
		2ć1l
		2ć1m
		2ć1n
		2ć1p
		2ć1lj
		2ć1r
		2ć1s
		2ć1t
		2ć1v
		2ć1nj
		2ć1dž
		2ć1z
		2ć1š
		2ć1đ
		2ć1ć
		2ć1č
		.h2
		.j2
		.k2
		.l2
		.m2
		.n2
		.p2
		.lj2
		.r2
		.s2
		.t2
		.v2
		.nj2
		.dž2
		.z2
		.š2
		.đ2
		.ć2
		.č2
		.ž2
		.b2
		.c2
		.d2
		.f2
		.g2
		o3a
		o3e
		o3i
		o3o
		o3u
		u3a
		u3e
		u3i
		u3o
		u3u
		a3a
		a3e
		a3i
		a3o
		a3u
		e3a
		e3e
		e3i
		e3o
		e3u
		i3a
		i3e
		i3i
		i3o
		i3u
		2a1
		2e1
		2i1
		2o1
		2u1
		2skb
		2skc
		2skd
		2skf
		2skg
		2skh
		2skk
		2skm
		2skn
		2skp
		2sks
		2skt
		2sknj
		2skdž
		2skz
		2skš
		2skđ
		2skć
		2skč
		2skž
		2stb
		2stc
		2std
		2stf
		2stg
		2sth
		2stk
		2stm
		2stn
		2stp
		2sts
		2stt
		2stnj
		2stdž
		2stz
		2stš
		2stđ
		2stć
		2stč
		2stž
		2škb
		2škc
		2škd
		2škf
		2škg
		2škh
		2škk
		2škm
		2škn
		2škp
		2šks
		2škt
		2šknj
		2škdž
		2škz
		2škš
		2škđ
		2škć
		2škč
		2škž
		2štb
		2štc
		2štd
		2štf
		2štg
		2šth
		2štk
		2štm
		2štn
		2štp
		2šts
		2štt
		2štnj
		2štdž
		2štz
		2štš
		2štđ
		2štć
		2štč
		2štž
		2spb
		2spc
		2spd
		2spf
		2spg
		2sph
		2spk
		2spm
		2spn
		2spp
		2sps
		2spt
		2spv
		2spnj
		2spdž
		2spz
		2spš
		2spđ
		2spć
		2spč
		2spž
		2svb
		2svc
		2svd
		2svf
		2svg
		2svh
		2svk
		2svm
		2svn
		2svp
		2svs
		2svt
		2svv
		2svnj
		2svdž
		2svz
		2svš
		2svđ
		2svć
		2svč
		2svž
		2špb
		2špc
		2špd
		2špf
		2špg
		2šph
		2špk
		2špm
		2špn
		2špp
		2šps
		2špt
		2špv
		2špnj
		2špdž
		2špz
		2špš
		2špđ
		2špć
		2špč
		2špž
		2švb
		2švc
		2švd
		2švf
		2švg
		2švh
		2švk
		2švm
		2švn
		2švp
		2švs
		2švt
		2švv
		2švnj
		2švdž
		2švz
		2švš
		2švđ
		2švć
		2švč
		2švž
		2ždb
		2ždc
		2ždd
		2ždf
		2ždg
		2ždh
		2ždk
		2ždm
		2ždn
		2ždp
		2žds
		2ždt
		2ždnj
		2žddž
		2ždz
		2ždš
		2ždđ
		2ždć
		2ždč
		2žgb
		2žgc
		2žgd
		2žgf
		2žgg
		2žgh
		2žgk
		2žgm
		2žgn
		2žgp
		2žgs
		2žgt
		2žgnj
		2žgdž
		2žgz
		2žgš
		2žgđ
		2žgć
		2žgč
		2žgž
		2zdb
		2zdc
		2zdd
		2zdf
		2zdg
		2zdh
		2zdk
		2zdm
		2zdn
		2zdp
		2zds
		2zdt
		2zdnj
		2zddž
		2zdz
		2zdš
		2zdđ
		2zdć
		2zdč
		2zgb
		2zgc
		2zgd
		2zgf
		2zgg
		2zgh
		2zgk
		2zgm
		2zgn
		2zgp
		2zgs
		2zgt
		2zgnj
		2zgdž
		2zgz
		2zgš
		2zgđ
		2zgć
		2zgč
		2zgž
		2žvb
		2žvc
		2žvd
		2žvf
		2žvg
		2žvh
		2žvk
		2žvm
		2žvn
		2žvp
		2žvs
		2žvt
		2žvv
		2žvnj
		2žvdž
		2žvz
		2žvš
		2žvđ
		2žvć
		2žvč
		2žvž
		2žbb
		2žbc
		2žbd
		2žbf
		2žbg
		2žbh
		2žbk
		2žbm
		2žbn
		2žbp
		2žbs
		2žbt
		2žbv
		2žbnj
		2žbdž
		2žbz
		2žbš
		2žbđ
		2žbć
		2žbč
		2žbž
		2zvb
		2zvc
		2zvd
		2zvf
		2zvg
		2zvh
		2zvk
		2zvm
		2zvn
		2zvp
		2zvs
		2zvt
		2zvv
		2zvnj
		2zvdž
		2zvz
		2zvš
		2zvđ
		2zvć
		2zvč
		2zvž
		2zbb
		2zbc
		2zbd
		2zbf
		2zbg
		2zbh
		2zbk
		2zbm
		2zbn
		2zbp
		2zbs
		2zbt
		2zbv
		2zbnj
		2zbdž
		2zbz
		2zbš
		2zbđ
		2zbć
		2zbč
		2zbž
		2žmb
		2žmc
		2žmd
		2žmf
		2žmg
		2žmh
		2žmk
		2žmm
		2žmn
		2žmp
		2žms
		2žmt
		2žmv
		2žmnj
		2žmdž
		2žmz
		2žmš
		2žmđ
		2žmć
		2žmč
		2žmž
		2smb
		2smc
		2smd
		2smf
		2smg
		2smh
		2smk
		2smm
		2smn
		2smp
		2sms
		2smt
		2smv
		2smnj
		2smdž
		2smz
		2smš
		2smđ
		2smć
		2smč
		2smž
		2zmb
		2zmc
		2zmd
		2zmf
		2zmg
		2zmh
		2zmk
		2zmm
		2zmn
		2zmp
		2zms
		2zmt
		2zmv
		2zmnj
		2zmdž
		2zmz
		2zmš
		2zmđ
		2zmć
		2zmč
		2zmž
		2šmb
		2šmc
		2šmd
		2šmf
		2šmg
		2šmh
		2šmk
		2šmm
		2šmn
		2šmp
		2šms
		2šmt
		2šmv
		2šmnj
		2šmdž
		2šmz
		2šmš
		2šmđ
		2šmć
		2šmč
		2šmž
		2scb
		2scc
		2scd
		2scf
		2scg
		2sch
		2sck
		2scl
		2scm
		2scn
		2scp
		2sclj
		2scr
		2scs
		2sct
		2scnj
		2scdž
		2scz
		2scš
		2scđ
		2scć
		2scč
		2scž
		2šcb
		2šcc
		2šcd
		2šcf
		2šcg
		2šch
		2šck
		2šcl
		2šcm
		2šcn
		2šcp
		2šclj
		2šcr
		2šcs
		2šct
		2šcnj
		2šcdž
		2šcz
		2šcš
		2šcđ
		2šcć
		2šcč
		2šcž
		2ščb
		2ščc
		2ščd
		2ščf
		2ščg
		2ščh
		2ščj
		2ščk
		2ščl
		2ščm
		2ščn
		2ščp
		2ščlj
		2ščr
		2ščs
		2ščt
		2ščnj
		2ščdž
		2ščz
		2ščš
		2ščđ
		2ščć
		2ščč
		2ščž
		2hvb
		2hvc
		2hvd
		2hvf
		2hvg
		2hvh
		2hvk
		2hvm
		2hvn
		2hvp
		2hvs
		2hvt
		2hvnj
		2hvdž
		2hvz
		2hvš
		2hvđ
		2hvć
		2hvč
		2hvž
		2ž3vl
		2ž3vlj
		2c3vl
		2c3vlj
		2z3vl
		2z3vlj
		2š3vl
		2š3vlj
		2č3vl
		2č3vlj
		2č3vj
		2s3vlj
		2d3vl
		2d3vlj
		2d3vr
		2k3vj
		2k3vl
		2k3vlj
		2t3vj
		2t3vl
		2t3vlj
		2g3vj
		2g3vl
		2g3vlj
		2g3vr
		2h3vj
		2h3vl
		2h3vlj
		2h3vr
		2ž3mj
		2ž3ml
		2ž3mlj
		2ž3mr
		2z3ml
		2z3mr
		2š3mj
		2š3ml
		2š3mlj
		2š3cj
		2š3cv
		2š3čv
		2š3tj
		2š3tl
		2š3tlj
		2s3tl
		2s3kj
		2s3klj
		2š3pj
		2š3pl
		2š3plj
		2ž3dj
		2ž3dl
		2ž3dlj
		2ž3dv
		2ž3gj
		2ž3gl
		2ž3glj
		2ž3gr
		2ž3gv
		2z3dl
		2z3dlj
		2z3dv
		2z3gj
		2z3glj
		2ž3bj
		2ž3bl
		2ž3blj
		2ž3br
		2z3blj
		.a4e2ro
		.be4o
		.bi4o
		.ge4o
		.za3g2n
		.za3t2ka
		.iza3g2n
		.iza3t2k
		.iz3g2n
		.izd2no
		.izd2nu
		.izd2na
		.izr2k
		.ist2k
		.nag2n
		.nag2nj
		.na3d2nev
		.na3d2nič
		.na3d2nic
		.na3t2kah
		.na3t2kam
		.na3t2kasm
		.na3t2kast
		.oda3g2n
		.oda3d2n
		.od3g2n
		.od3m2n
		.o3t2kah
		.o3t2kam
		.o3t2kasm
		.o3t2kast
		.po3g2n
		.po3d2nev
		.po3m2n
		.po3m2nj
		.po3r2v
		.po3r2đ
		.po3t2kah
		.po3t2kam
		.po3t2kat
		.po3t2kav
		.pred3m2n
		.pred3m2nj
		.pre3t2kah
		.pre3t2kam
		.pre3t2kat
		.pro3g2n
		.pro3t2ki
		.pro3t2ka
		.raza3g2n
		.raz3g2n
		.raz3d2ni
		.raza3t2ka
		.u3g2mi
		.u3g2n
		.uza3t2ka
		3h2teti
		3h2tjeti
		3h2tel
		3h2tev
		3h2tenj
		3h2tjel
		3h2tjev
		3h2tjenj
		3g2degod.
		3g2djegod.
		3g2dekak
		3g2dekad
		3g2djekak
		3g2djekad
		ni3g2de.
		ne3g2de.
		ni3g2dje.
		ne3g2dje.
		3b2det
		3b2denj
		3b2djet
		3b2djenj
		3g2mil
		3g2milj
		3g2miz
		3g2nos
		3g2noz
		3g2noj
		3g2naj
		3g2nezd
		3g2nijezd
		3g2nežđ
		3g2niježđ
		3g2nev
		3g2njev
		3g2njav
		3g2njes
		3g2njet
		3g2nječ
		3g2njil
		3g2njio
		3g2njilj
		3g2njit
		3g2njur
		3k2nez
		3k2než
		3k2njiž
		3k2njig
		3m2nož
		3m2nog
		3m2naž
		3p2sik
		3p2sič
		3p2sov
		3p2suj
		3r2đa
		3s2fer
		3t2mast
		3t2mul
		3t2muo
		3t2mulj
		3t2mur
		3c2miz
		3c2mak
		3c2mač
		3c2mok
		3č2lan
		3č2lanj
		3r2je
		4r3jem
		4r3je.
		.be2z3j
		.be2z3l
		.be2z3m
		.be2z3n
		.be2z3lj
		.be2z3r
		.be2z3v
		.be2z3nj
		.be2z3b
		.be2z3d
		.be2z3g
		.be2z3i
		.be2z3o
		.be2z3u
		.be2z3alkohol
		.be2z3atomsk
		.be3z4bedn
		.be3z4beda
		.be3z4bjedn
		.be3z4bjeda
		.be3z4beli
		.be3z4bol
		.be3z4vučn
		.be3z4vuča
		.be3z4istan
		.be3z4isten
		.be3z4jak
		.be3z4jač
		.be3z4lobn
		.be3z4loba
		.be3z4načaj
		.be3z4račn
		.be3z4rača
		.be3z4up
		.be3z4ub
		.be2s3c
		.be2s3k
		.be2s3p
		.be2s3t
		.be3s4krupul
		.be3s4pokojn
		.be3s4pokoja
		.be3s4porn
		.be3s4pora
		.be3s4tvar
		.be3s4tid
		.be3s4tija
		.be3s4tilu
		.be3s4tilj
		.be3s4trana
		.be3s4tras
		.bes4tseler
		.be2š3ć
		.be2š3č
		.va2n3evr
		.va2n3ustav
		.i2z3b
		.i2z3d
		.i2z3g
		.i2z3j
		.i2z3l
		.i2z3m
		.i2z3n
		.i2z3lj
		.i2z3r
		.i2z3v
		.i2z3nj
		.i2z3i
		.i2z3o
		.i2z3u
		.i2z3bija
		.i2z3biva
		.i2z3vedi
		.i2z3vedn
		.i2z3vedb
		.i2z3vede
		.i2z3daj
		.i2z3aba
		.i2z3aka
		.i2z3anal
		.i3z4bav
		.i3z4bičkava
		.i3z4bleušan
		.i3z4bojak
		.i3z4bojk
		.i3z4vali
		.i3z4valu
		.i3z4vala
		.i3z4vale
		.i3z4valji
		.i3z4vižd
		.i3z4viiskr
		.i3z4vija
		.i3z4vijen
		.i3z4vin
		.i3z4vir
